Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2398.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1.
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Quindaro ruins archaeological park project....................................$600,000
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $250,000 shall
be made by the above agency from such account to issue a scope
statement, plan the work to be accomplished and issue a request for
proposals for a master plan for the Quindaro ruins archaeological park in
Wyandotte county, Kansas: Provided further, That all moneys remaining in
such account shall be used to implement such master plan phase one
renovations for the Quindaro ruins archaeological park: And provided
further, That it is the intent of the legislature to provide additional funds
for the Quindaro ruins archaeological park in future fiscal years based on
such master plan.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.